Illinois, session 104th, SB517.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Information Technology Accessibility Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 587/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Information Technology Accessibility Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-307, eff. 8-20-07.)